Washington statutes.
RCW 17.24.111

Director's cooperation with other agencies.

The director may enter into cooperative arrangements with a person, municipality, county, Washington State University or any of its experiment stations, or other agencies of this state, and with boards, officers, and authorities of other states and the United States, including the United States department of agriculture, for the inspection of bees, plants and plant parts and products and the control or eradication of plant pests, bee pests, or noxious weeds and to carry out other provisions of this chapter.

[ 1991 c 257 s 15.]